New York, session 2025-2026, A4940.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 634 of the family court act, as amended by chapter 2 666 of the laws of 1976, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 634. Commitment of guardianship and custody; further orders. The 4 court may enter an order under section six hundred thirty-one of this 5 part committing the guardianship and custody of the child to the peti- 6 tioner on such conditions, if any, as it deems proper, including but not 7 limited to, an order of post-termination visitation and/or contact 8 pursuant to section three hundred eighty-four-b of the social services 9 law. 10 § 2. Section 384-b of the social services law is amended by adding six 11 new subdivisions 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, and 19 to read as follows: 12 14. (a) Upon application by any party to a proceeding under this 13 section, (i) the court shall order post-termination visitation and/or 14 contact between the child and such child's parent who is a party to such 15 proceeding on such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the 16 parent, the child, and the foster parent or authorized agency prior to 17 the entry of an order committing the guardianship and custody of the 18 child, and upon a determination by the court that such post-termination 19 visitation and/or contact would be in the best interest of the child; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08174-04-5 A. 4940--B 2 1 (ii) if any party does not consent, the court may order post-termination 2 visitation and/or contact between the child and the child's parent after 3 a hearing at which the court has determined that (A) the party's consent 4 is being unreasonably withheld; and (B) post-termination visitation 5 and/or contact would be in the best interest of the child. 6 (b) The hearing to determine whether the court should enter an order 7 of post-termination visitation and/or contact shall be held either (i) 8 concurrently with a dispositional hearing held in the proceedings to 9 terminate the parent's rights pursuant to this section; or (ii) if no 10 dispositional hearing is held, subsequent to the close of the fact-find- 11 ing hearing on the underlying petition to terminate the parent's rights 12 and prior to the court's entry of an order committing the guardianship 13 and custody of the child. The court shall not hold such a hearing at 14 any other time. 15 (c) Parents and children who are parties to a termination proceeding 16 under article six of the family court act or this section, as well as 17 such child's foster parents, or, in the case of a child who is not in 18 the care of a foster parent, the authorized agency, shall have notice of 19 and standing to participate in the best interest post-termination visi- 20 tation and/or contact hearing. A child who is a party to a post-termina- 21 tion visitation and/or contact hearing must be represented by an attor- 22 ney for the child. 23 (d) The applicant shall have the burden of proof that (i) the opposing 24 party's consent has been unreasonably withheld; and (ii) post-termina- 25 tion visitation and/or contact is in the child's best interest. 26 (e) If the application for post-termination contact is denied after 27 this hearing, the applicant shall not have standing to bring the same 28 application in any other proceeding regarding the same child. However, 29 if the court grants any visitation and/or contact, an application to 30 modify the order, upon a showing of substantial change in circumstances, 31 may still be brought, pursuant to subdivision fifteen of this section. 32 (f) The court shall have discretion, depending on the best interests 33 of the child, to determine the nature of any post-termination visitation 34 and/or contact. 35 (g) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 36 sion, in no event shall an order of post-termination visitation and/or 37 contact be entered where a court has entered a finding pursuant to para- 38 graph (a) or (b) of subdivision eight of this section that a parent 39 severely or repeatedly abused the child, except where a court has deter- 40 mined that the parent seeking post-termination visitation and/or contact 41 was not the perpetrator of such severe or repeated abuse of such child. 42 (h) If the child is over fourteen years of age, the consent of such 43 child to post-termination visitation and/or contact is required. 44 (i) The court in its order shall indicate such person or persons who 45 were given notice of the proceeding and whether such person or persons 46 appeared. 47 15. All parties to a post-termination visitation and/or contact order 48 entered pursuant to subdivision fourteen of this section, as well as any 49 person who subsequently becomes the child's legal guardian, custodian or 50 adoptive parent, may move the court to enforce or modify such order. 51 Upon motion for modification by any such party, (i) the court shall 52 enter an order modifying such post-termination visitation and/or contact 53 order on such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the parties, 54 upon a determination that such modification of the post-termination 55 visitation and/or contact order would be in the best interest of the 56 child, or, (ii) if any party does not consent, the court may enter an A. 4940--B 3 1 order modifying such post-termination visitation and/or contact order, 2 after a hearing at which the court has determined that (A) the party's 3 consent is being unreasonably withheld; and (B) the modification would 4 be based on a showing of a substantial change in circumstances and the 5 best interests of the child. 6 16. Nothing in subdivision fourteen or fifteen of this section shall 7 be construed to limit the rights of half-siblings or siblings to seek 8 contact pursuant to subdivision nine of this section or section seven- 9 ty-one of the domestic relations law following a termination of parental 10 rights or adoption. 11 17. The failure of an authorized agency or a child's foster parent or 12 any other person who subsequently becomes the child's legal guardian, 13 custodian or adoptive parent to comply with the terms of the order of 14 post-termination visitation and/or contact shall not constitute a basis 15 for invalidating either the order committing the guardianship and custo- 16 dy of the child to the petitioner or any subsequent order of adoption 17 regarding such child. 18 18. Unless a stay of adoption proceedings is granted by a judge of the 19 family court or appellate court, an appeal from any order regarding the 20 application for post-termination visitation and/or contact shall not 21 provide a basis for delaying the finalization of a child's adoption. 22 19. Pursuant to paragraph (iv) of subdivision (a) of section two 23 hundred sixty-two of the family court act, the foster parent, adoptive 24 parent, legal guardian or custodian shall have the right to assigned 25 counsel in any proceedings pursuant to this section. 26 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 27 it shall have become a law.